Utah statutes.
20A-11-803.   Criminal penalties.

(1) (a)  Each political issues committee that fails to file the statement due August 31 or before the regular general election is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(b)  The lieutenant governor shall report all violations of Subsection (1)(a) to the attorney general.

(2)  Within 30 days after a deadline for the filing of the January 10 statement, the lieutenant governor shall review each filed statement to ensure that:

(a)  each political issues committee that is required to file a statement has filed one; and

(b)  each statement contains the information required by this part.

(3)  If it appears that any political issues committee has failed to file the January 10 statement, if it appears that a filed statement does not conform to the law, or if the lieutenant governor has received a written complaint alleging a violation of the law or the falsity of any statement, the lieutenant governor shall, within five days of discovery of a violation or receipt of a written complaint, notify the political issues committee of the violation or written complaint and direct the political issues committee to file a statement correcting the problem.

(4) (a)  It is unlawful for any political issues committee to fail to file or amend a statement within 14 days after receiving notice from the lieutenant governor under this section.

(b)  Each political issues committee who violates Subsection (4)(a) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(c)  The lieutenant governor shall report all violations of Subsection (4)(a) to the attorney general.

